Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2622
Child Care Grant Fund; established; use; investment.

The Child Care Grant Fund is hereby established to be administered by the Department of Health and Human Services. The fund shall be used to make grants pursuant to section 43-2624. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1991, LB 836, § 23;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 29;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 230;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 100.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.